Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1810.01
Practice of dietetics and nutrition, defined.

Practice of dietetics and nutrition means the integration and application of scientific principles derived from the study of food, nutrition, biochemistry, metabolism, nutrigenomics, physiology, food management, and behavioral and social sciences in achieving and maintaining health throughout the life span and in providing nutrition care in person or by telehealth, including medical nutrition therapy, for the purpose of disease management and prevention, or to treat or rehabilitate an illness, injury, or condition. The primary functions of the practice of dietetics and nutrition are the provision of medical nutrition therapy for the purpose of disease management or to treat or rehabilitate an illness, injury, or condition and the provision of other nutrition-care services for health and wellness and as primary prevention of chronic disease.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 36.